Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1130.
do enact as follows:AB1130,11Section 1. 20.835 (2) (fg) of the statutes is created to read:AB1130,2,3220.835 (2) (fg) Premium assistance credit. A sum sufficient to make the 3payments under s. 71.07 (12).AB1130,24Section 2. 71.07 (12) of the statutes is created to read:AB1130,2,5571.07 (12) Premium assistance credit. (a) Definitions. In this subsection:AB1130,2,661. “Claimant” means an individual who files a claim under this subsection.AB1130,2,772. “Qualified health plan” has the meaning given in 45 CFR 155.20.AB1130,2,138(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and 9subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant who pays monthly 10premiums for a qualified health plan during the taxable year may claim as a credit 11against the tax imposed under s. 71.02 the premium assistance amount that the 12claimant would have been eligible to claim under 26 USC 36B for a taxable year 13beginning after December 31, 2020, and before January 1, 2026.AB1130,2,1514(c) Limitations. 1. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless it is 15claimed within the time period under s. 71.75 (2).AB1130,2,17162. Part-year residents and nonresidents of this state are not eligible for the 17credit under this subsection.AB1130,2,20183. No claimant may claim a credit under this subsection for a taxable year 19beginning after December 31, 2025, if the claimant is eligible to claim a premium 20assistance amount under 26 USC 36B or similar federal law.AB1130,2,2221(d) Administration. 1. Section 71.28 (4) (g) and (h), as it applies to the credit 22under s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB1130,3,612. If the allowable amount of the claim under par. (b) exceeds the tax 2otherwise due under s. 71.02, the amount of the claim not used to offset the tax due 3shall be certified by the department to the department of administration for 4payment by check, share draft, or other draft drawn from the appropriation account 5under s. 20.835 (2) (fg). Notwithstanding s. 71.82, no interest may be paid on 6amounts certified under this subdivision.AB1130,37Section 3. 71.10 (4) (i) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 8is amended to read:AB1130,3,18971.10 (4) (i) The total of claim of right credit under s. 71.07 (1), farmland 10preservation credit under ss. 71.57 to 71.61, farmland preservation credit, 2010 and 11beyond under s. 71.613, homestead credit under subch. VIII, jobs tax credit under s. 1271.07 (3q), business development credit under s. 71.07 (3y), research credit under s. 1371.07 (4k) (e) 2. a., film production services credit under s. 71.07 (5f) (b) 2., veterans 14and surviving spouses property tax credit under s. 71.07 (6e), enterprise zone jobs 15credit under s. 71.07 (3w), electronics and information technology manufacturing 16zone credit under s. 71.07 (3wm), earned income tax credit under s. 71.07 (9e), 17premium assistance credit under s. 71.07 (12), estimated tax payments under s. 1871.09, and taxes withheld under subch. X.AB1130,3,1919